Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB813.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "License agreement" means an agreement for a marina operator to use the
land owned or leased by the Commonwealth of Kentucky as a state marina;
(b) "Marina operator" means the owner of a marina facility who is operating a
state marina; and
(c) "State marina" means a marina which is located on land owned or leased
by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and which is part of the Department of
Parks.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45A or any other law to the contrary, the Finance
and Administration Cabinet may enter into an agreement with a marina operator
to renew or extend a license agreement or any other agreement with the marina
operator provided that the following criteria are met:
(a) The marina operator has fulfilled all of his or her obligations existing
under any license agreement and any other agreement with the
Commonwealth;
(b) The marina operator is in good standing with the Department of Parks; and
(c) The Commonwealth of Kentucky determines in writing that it is in the best
interests of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to enter into an agreement with
the marina operator.
Page 1 of 1
BR196900.100 - 1969 - XXXX 2/20/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed